Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.060

Maximum parking fee schedule.

The lease referred to in RCW 35.86.040 shall specify a schedule of maximum parking fees which the operator may charge. This maximum parking fee schedule may be modified from time to time by agreement of the city and the operator.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.86.060. Prior: 1959 c 302 s 6.]